District of Columbia statutes.
47-4511

Payroll deductions.

The District of Columbia and its agencies may agree, by contract or otherwise, to remit payments on behalf of an employee to an account through payroll deductions.

History

Mar. 31, 2001, D.C. Law 13-212, § 2(b), 47 DCR 9457